Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.904

Effective dates—2007 c 494.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2007, except for section 104 of this act, which takes effect immediately [May 15, 2007], and section 508 of this act, which takes effect June 30, 2007.

[ 2007 c 494 s 512.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.